test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-kulgad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kulgâđ: # ML checked

    kulgâđ+V+Inf: kulgâđ
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: kulguđ

    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kulguum
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kulguuh
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgoo
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kolgojeen
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kulguuvettee
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kulguv
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kulgup
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kulguuvetteđ
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kolgojeh

    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolgojim
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kolgojih
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kulgui
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kulguim
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kulguid
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kulguin
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kulguim
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kulguid
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kolgojii

    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kulguuččim
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kulguuččih
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kulguuččij
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kulguuččáim
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kulguuččáid
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kulguuččáin
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kulguuččijm
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kulguuččijd
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kulguuččii

#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kulguužeem
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kulguužeeh
##    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kulguš
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kulguužeen
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kulgušvettee
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kulguužává
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kulguužep
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kulgušvetteđ
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kulguužeh

    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kulguu
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kulgum
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kulguuččii
#    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kulguužii
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [kolgojeijee, kolgojijjee]
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: kulgum #Lene added kuulgum; MLO: aborted, a fautive form
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: kulgum
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: kulguumin
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: kulguumist
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: kulguumân
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: kulguudijn
    kulgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: kulguuhánnáá

    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolgâdâm
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kolgâdah
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koolgâd
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kolgâdeen
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: koolgâdvettee
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kolgâdává
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kolgâdeh
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: koolgâd
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolgâdim
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kolgâdij
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kolgâdii

    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kolgâdiččim
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kolgâdičij
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kolgâdižžeem
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kolgâdiš
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: koolgâd
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kolgâdâm
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kolgâdižžii
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: kolgâdâm
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: koolgâdhánnáá

    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: kolgâdem
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: koolgâdmân
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: koolgâdmin
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: koolgâdmist
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: koolgâddijn
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: koolgâddijnân
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: koolgâddijnâd
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: koolgâddijnis
    kulgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: koolgâddijn

    kulgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolgâstâm
    kulgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolgâttâm
    kulgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kulgâškuáđám
